Mississippi statutes. Title 15. Limitations of Actions and Prevention of Frauds
Chapter 1. Limitation of Actions

§ 15-1-1.
Application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any suit which is or shall be limited by any statute to be brought within a shorter time than is prescribed in this chapter, and such suit shall be brought within the time that may be limited by such statute.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 24; 1871, § 2168; 1880, § 2689; 1892, § 2763a; 1906, § 3126; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2490; 1930, § 2293; 1942, § 723.

§ 15-1-3.
Completion of limitation extinguishes right; partial payment.

The completion of the period of limitation prescribed to bar any action, shall defeat and extinguish the right as well as the remedy. However, the former legal obligation shall be a sufficient consideration to uphold a new promise based thereon.

In any case founded on a debt, when any part of the debt shall have been paid, or an acknowledgment of an existing liability, debt or claim, or any promise to pay the same shall have been made, the statute of limitations not having run, an action may be brought in such case within the period prescribed for the same, with the said period to begin after such payment, acknowledgment or promise.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2685; 1892, § 2755; 1906, § 3115; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2479; 1930, § 2313; 1942, § 743; Laws, 2005, ch. 417, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2005.

§ 15-1-5.
Period of limitations shall not be changed by contract.

The limitations prescribed in this chapter shall not be changed in any way whatsoever by contract between parties, and any change in such limitations made by any contracts stipulation whatsoever shall be absolutely null and void, the object of this section being to make the period of limitations for the various causes of action the same for all litigants.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3127; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2491; 1930, § 2294; 1942, § 724.

§ 15-1-7.
Limitations applicable to actions to recover land.

A person may not make an entry or commence an action to recover land except within ten years next after the time at which the right to make the entry or to bring the action shall have first accrued to some person through whom he claims, or, if the right shall not have accrued to any person through whom he claims, then except within ten years next after the time at which the right to make the entry or bring the action shall have first accrued to the person making or bringing the same. However, if, at the time at which the right of any person to make an entry or to bring an action to recover land shall have first accrued, such person shall have been under the disability of infancy or unsoundness of mind, then such person or the person claiming through him may, notwithstanding that the period of ten years hereinbefore limited shall have expired, make an entry or bring an action to recover the land at any time within ten years next after the time at which the person to whom the right shall have first accrued shall have ceased to be under either disability, or shall have died, whichever shall have first happened. However, when any person who shall be under either of the disabilities mentioned, at the time at which his right shall have first accrued, shall depart this life without having ceased to be under such disability, no time shall be allowed, by reason of the disability of any other person, to make an entry or to bring an action to recover the land beyond the period of ten years next after the time at which such person shall have died.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, arts. 1 (1), 6 (1); 1857, ch. 57, art. 1; 1871, § 2147; 1880, § 2664; 1892, § 2730; 1906, § 3090; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2454; 1930, § 2285; 1942, § 709.

§ 15-1-9.
Limitations applicable to suits in equity to recover land.

A person claiming land in equity may not bring suit to recover the same except within the period during which, by virtue of Section 15-1-7, he might have made an entry or brought an action to recover the same, if he had been entitled at law to such an estate, interest, or right in or to the same as he shall claim therein in equity. However, in every case of a concealed fraud, the right of any person to bring suit in equity for the recovery of land, of which he or any person through whom he claims may have been deprived by such fraud, shall be deemed to have first accrued at and not before the time at which the fraud shall, or, with reasonable diligence might, have been first known or discovered.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 6 (2); 1857, ch. 57, art. 2; 1871, § 2148; 1880, § 2665; 1892, § 2731; 1906, § 3091; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2455; 1930, § 2286; 1942, § 710.

§ 15-1-11.
Limitations applicable to actions to recover land for defect in instrument.

Any person who has a right of action for the recovery of land because of any one or more of the following enumerated defects in any instrument, shall institute his suit therefor not later than 10 years next after the date when such instrument has been actually recorded in the office of the clerk of the chancery court of the county in which such real estate is situated and not afterwards:

where it has not been signed by the proper officer of any corporation;

where the corporate seal of the corporation has not been impressed on such instrument;

where the record does not show such corporate seal;

because the record does not show authority therefor by the board of directors and stockholders (or either of them) of a corporation;

where such instrument was executed and delivered by a corporation which had been dissolved or whose charter had expired, or whose corporate franchise had been cancelled, withdrawn or forfeited;

where the executor, administrator, guardian, assignee, receiver, master in chancery, agent or trustee, or other agency making such instrument, signed or acknowledged the same individually instead of in his representative or official capacity;

where such instrument is executed by a trustee without record of judicial or other ascertainment of the authority of such trustee or of the verity of the facts therein recited;

where the officer taking the acknowledgment of such instrument having an official seal did not affix the same to the certificate of acknowledgment;

where the notarial seal is not shown of record;

where the wording of the consideration may or might create an implied lien in favor of the grantor (by this is not meant an express vendor’s lien retained).

If, at the time at which the right of any person to bring an action for the recovery of land because of any such defects, shall have first accrued, such persons shall have been under the disability of infancy or unsoundness of mind, then such person or the person claiming through him, may, notwithstanding that the period of limitations hereinbefore provided for shall have expired, bring an action to recover the land at any time within the period of limitations provided herein next after the time at which the person to whom the right shall have first accrued shall have ceased to be under either disability, or shall have died, whichever shall have first happened. However, when any person who shall be under either of the disabilities mentioned, at the time at which his right shall have first accrued, shall depart this life without having ceased to be under such disability no time to bring an action to recover the land beyond the period of limitations provided herein next after the time at which such persons shall have died, shall be allowed by reason of the disability of any other person. Moreover, the saving in favor of persons under disability of unsoundness of mind shall never extend longer than thirty-one years.

This section shall not, however, apply to forged instruments.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 712, 714; Laws, 1942, ch. 300.

§ 15-1-13.
Ten years’ adverse possession gives title; exceptions.

Ten (10) years’ actual adverse possession by any person claiming to be the owner for that time of any land, uninterruptedly continued for ten (10) years by occupancy, descent, conveyance, or otherwise, in whatever way such occupancy may have commenced or continued, shall vest in every actual occupant or possessor of such land a full and complete title, saving to persons under the disability of minority or unsoundness of mind the right to sue within ten (10) years after the removal of such disability, as provided in Section 15-1-7. However, the saving in favor of persons under disability of unsoundness of mind shall never extend longer than thirty-one (31) years.

For claims of adverse possession not matured as of July 1, 1998, the provisions of subsection (1) shall not apply to a landowner upon whose property a fence or driveway has been built who files with the chancery clerk within the ten (10) years required by this section a written notice that such fence or driveway is built without the permission of the landowner. Failure to file such notice shall not create any inference that property has been adversely possessed. The notice shall be filed in the land records by the chancery clerk and shall describe the property where said fence or driveway is constructed.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 6 (3); 1857, ch. 57, art. 3; 1871, § 2149; 1880, § 2668; 1892, § 2734; 1906, § 3094; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2458; 1930, § 2287; 1942, § 711; Laws, 1998, ch. 504, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998, and shall apply to claims arising on or after July 1, 1998.

§ 15-1-15.
Three years’ actual occupation under a tax title bars suit.

Actual occupation for three years, after two years from the day of sale of land held under a conveyance by a tax collector in pursuance of a sale for taxes, shall bar any suit to recover such land or assail such title because of any defect in the sale of the land for taxes, or in any precedent step to the sale, saving to minors and persons of unsound mind the right to bring suit within such time, after the removal of their disabilities, and upon the same terms as is provided for the redemption of land by such persons.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 1709; 1880, § 539; 1892, § 2735; 1906, § 3095; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2459; 1930, § 2288; 1942, § 716; Laws, 1912, ch. 233.

§ 15-1-17.
Limitations applicable to actions or suits to cancel tax titles.

The owner, mortgagee or other person interested in any land which has been sold or forfeited to the state for delinquent taxes may bring a suit or action to cancel the title of the state, or its patentees, or to recover said land from the state, or its patentees, on account of any defect, irregularity or illegality in the assessment, levy or sale of such land for delinquent taxes within two years after the period of redemption shall have expired, and not thereafter. However, the limitations herein fixed shall not apply when the taxes on such land had been paid prior to the time it was sold for taxes.

If any person entitled to bring any such suit or action shall, at the time at which the cause of action accrues, be under the disability of infancy, or unsoundness of mind, he may bring the suit or action within the time in this section respectively limited after his disability shall be removed but the saving of persons under disability shall never extend longer than twenty-one years.

The completion of the limitation herein prescribed to bar any action shall defeat and extinguish all the right, title and interest, including the right of possession in and to such land, of any and all persons whatsoever, except the State of Mississippi and its patentees, and it shall vest in the state, and its patentees, a fee simple title to such lands.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 717; Laws, 1934, ch. 196.

§ 15-1-19.
Limitations applicable to suits to redeem mortgage or deed of trust.

When a mortgagee, after condition broken, shall obtain the actual possession or receipt of the profits or rent of land embraced in his mortgage, the mortgagor, or any person claiming through him, may not bring a suit to redeem the mortgage except within ten years next after the time at which the mortgagee obtained such possession or receipt, unless in the meantime an acknowledgment of the title of the mortgagor, or of his right of redemption, shall have been given in writing, signed by the mortgagee, or the person claiming through him. In such case a suit may not be brought except within ten years next after the time at which such acknowledgment, or the last of such acknowledgments, if more than one, was given. Such acknowledgment shall be effectual only as against, and to the extent of the interest of the party signing it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 3; 1871, § 2149; 1880, § 2666; 1892, § 2732; 1906, § 3092; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2456; 1930, § 2289; 1942, § 718.

§ 15-1-21.
Actions on mortgages, deeds of trust, and statutory liens to be brought within time allowed for action upon writing in which debt is specified.

When a mortgage or deed of trust shall be given on real or personal estate, or when a lien shall be given by law, to secure the payment of a sum of money specified in any writing, an action or suit or other proceedings shall not be brought or had upon such lien, mortgage, or deed of trust to recover the sum of money so secured except within the time that may be allowed for the commencement of an action at law upon the writing in which the sum of money secured by such lien, mortgage, or deed of trust may be specified. In all cases where the remedy at law to recover the debt shall be barred, the remedy in equity on the mortgage shall be barred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 4; 1871, § 2150; 1880, § 2667; 1892, § 2733; 1906, § 3093; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2457; 1930, § 2290; 1942, § 719.

§ 15-1-23.
Limitations applicable to suits or actions on installment notes following foreclosure or sale of property pledged as security therefor.

In all cases, no suit or action shall hereafter be commenced or brought upon any installment note, or series of notes of three or more, whether due or not, where said note or notes are secured by mortgage, deed of trust, or otherwise, upon any property, real or personal, unless the same is commenced or brought within one year from the date of the foreclosure or sale of the property pledged as security for said note or notes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 720; Laws, 1934, ch. 251.

§ 15-1-25.
Limitations applicable to action or scire facias against executor or administrator.

An action or scire facias may not be brought against any executor or administrator upon any judgment or other cause of action against his testator or intestate, except within four years after the qualification of such executor or administrator.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art 6 (12); 1857, ch. 57, art. 11; 1871, § 2155; 1880, § 2676; 1892, § 2745; 1906, § 3105; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2469; 1930, § 2295; 1942, § 725.

§ 15-1-27.
Limitations applicable to action by ward against guardian or surety.

All actions against a guardian and the sureties on his bond, or either of them, by the ward, shall be commenced within five years next after the ward shall have arrived at the age of twenty-one years, and not after.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2738; 1906, § 3098; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2462; 1930, § 2296; 1942, § 726.

§ 15-1-29.
Limitations applicable to actions on accounts and unwritten contracts.

Except as otherwise provided in the Uniform Commercial Code, actions on an open account or account stated not acknowledged in writing, signed by the debtor, and on any unwritten contract, express or implied, shall be commenced within three (3) years next after the cause of such action accrued, and not after, except that an action based on an unwritten contract of employment shall be commenced within one (1) year next after the cause of such action accrued, and not after.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art 6 (10); 1857, ch. 57, art. 5; 1871, § 2151; 1880, § 2670; 1892 § 2739; 1906, § 3099; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2463; 1930, § 2299; 1942, § 729; Laws, 1964, ch. 299; Laws, 1966, ch. 316, § 10-105; Laws, 1976, ch. 488, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 15-1-31.
When statute commences to run on open accounts.

In all actions brought to recover the balance due upon a mutual and open current account, where both parties are merchants or traders, the cause of action shall be deemed to have accrued at the time of the true date of the last item proved in such account. In all other actions upon open accounts, the period of limitation shall commence to run against the several items thereof from the dates at which the same respectively became due and payable.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 6 (10); 1857, ch. 57, art. 20; 1871, § 2164; 1880, § 2671; 1892, § 2740; 1906, § 3100; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2464; 1930, § 2300; 1942, § 730.

§ 15-1-33.
Limitations applicable to actions and suits for penalty or forfeiture.

All actions and suits for any penalty or forfeiture on any penal statute, brought by any person to whom the penalty or forfeiture is given, in whole or in part, shall be commenced within one year next after the offense was committed, and not after.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 23; 1871, § 2167; 1880, § 2672; 1892, § 2741; 1906, § 3101; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2465; 1930, § 2301; 1942, § 731.

§ 15-1-35.
Limitations applicable to actions for certain torts.

All actions for assault, assault and battery, maiming, false imprisonment, malicious arrest, or menace, and all actions for slanderous words concerning the person or title, for failure to employ, and for libels, shall be commenced within one (1) year next after the cause of such action accrued, and not after.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 6 (6); 1857, ch. 57, art. 7; 1871, § 2152; 1880, § 2673; 1892, § 2742; 1906, § 3102; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2466; 1930, § 2302; 1942, § 732; Laws, 1983, ch. 394, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 15-1-36.
Limitations applicable to malpractice action arising from medical, surgical or other professional services.

For any claim accruing on or before June 30, 1998, and except as otherwise provided in this section, no claim in tort may be brought against a licensed physician, osteopath, dentist, hospital, institution for the aged or infirm, nurse, pharmacist, podiatrist, optometrist or chiropractor for injuries or wrongful death arising out of the course of medical, surgical or other professional services unless it is filed within two (2) years from the date the alleged act, omission or neglect shall or with reasonable diligence might have been first known or discovered.

For any claim accruing on or after July 1, 1998, and except as otherwise provided in this section, no claim in tort may be brought against a licensed physician, osteopath, dentist, hospital, institution for the aged or infirm, nurse, pharmacist, podiatrist, optometrist or chiropractor for injuries or wrongful death arising out of the course of medical, surgical or other professional services unless it is filed within two (2) years from the date the alleged act, omission or neglect shall or with reasonable diligence might have been first known or discovered, and, except as described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, in no event more than seven (7) years after the alleged act, omission or neglect occurred:

In the event a foreign object introduced during a surgical or medical procedure has been left in a patient’s body, the cause of action shall be deemed to have first accrued at, and not before, the time at which the foreign object is, or with reasonable diligence should have been, first known or discovered to be in the patient’s body.

In the event the cause of action shall have been fraudulently concealed from the knowledge of the person entitled thereto, the cause of action shall be deemed to have first accrued at, and not before, the time at which such fraud shall be, or with reasonable diligence should have been, first known or discovered.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, if at the time at which the cause of action shall or with reasonable diligence might have been first known or discovered, the person to whom such claim has accrued shall be six (6) years of age or younger, then such minor or the person claiming through such minor may, notwithstanding that the period of time limited pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall have expired, commence action on such claim at any time within two (2) years next after the time at which the minor shall have reached his sixth birthday, or shall have died, whichever shall have first occurred.

If at the time at which the cause of action shall or with reasonable diligence might have been first known or discovered, the person to whom such claim has accrued shall be a minor without a parent or legal guardian, then such minor or the person claiming through such minor may, notwithstanding that the period of time limited pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall have expired, commence action on such claim at any time within two (2) years next after the time at which the minor shall have a parent or legal guardian or shall have died, whichever shall have first occurred; provided, however, that in no event shall the period of limitation begin to run prior to such minor’s sixth birthday unless such minor shall have died.

If at the time at which the cause of action shall or with reasonable diligence might have been first known or discovered, the person to whom such claim has accrued shall be under the disability of unsoundness of mind, then such person or the person claiming through him may, notwithstanding that the period of time hereinbefore limited shall have expired, commence action on such claim at any time within two (2) years next after the time at which the person to whom the right shall have first accrued shall have ceased to be under the disability, or shall have died, whichever shall have first occurred.

When any person who shall be under the disabilities mentioned in subsections (3), (4) and (5) of this section at the time at which his right shall have first accrued, shall depart this life without having ceased to be under such disability, no time shall be allowed by reason of the disability of such person to commence action on the claim of such person beyond the period prescribed under Section 15-1-55, Mississippi Code of 1972.

For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section, and only for the purposes of such subsection, the disability of infancy or minority shall be removed from and after a person has reached his sixth birthday.

For the purposes of subsection (4) of this section, and only for the purposes of such subsection, the disability of infancy or minority shall be removed from and after a person has reached his sixth birthday or from and after such person shall have a parent or legal guardian, whichever occurs later, unless such disability is otherwise removed by law.

The limitation established by this section as to a licensed physician, osteopath, dentist, hospital or nurse shall apply only to actions the cause of which accrued on or after July 1, 1976.

The limitation established by this section as to pharmacists shall apply only to actions the cause of which accrued on or after July 1, 1978.

The limitation established by this section as to podiatrists shall apply only to actions the cause of which accrued on or after July 1, 1979.

The limitation established by this section as to optometrists and chiropractors shall apply only to actions the cause of which accrued on or after July 1, 1983.

The limitation established by this section as to actions commenced on behalf of minors shall apply only to actions the cause of which accrued on or after July 1, 1989.

The limitation established by this section as to institutions for the aged or infirm shall apply only to actions the cause of which occurred on or after January 1, 2003.

No action based upon the health care provider’s professional negligence may be begun unless the defendant has been given at least sixty (60) days’ prior written notice of the intention to begin the action. No particular form of notice is required, but it shall notify the defendant of the legal basis of the claim and the type of loss sustained, including with specificity the nature of the injuries suffered. If the notice is served within sixty (60) days prior to the expiration of the applicable statute of limitations, the time for the commencement of the action shall be extended sixty (60) days from the service of the notice for said health care providers and others. This subsection shall not be applicable with respect to any defendant whose name is unknown to the plaintiff at the time of filing the complaint and who is identified therein by a fictitious name.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 473; Laws, 1978, ch. 464, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 347; Laws, 1983, ch. 482, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 311, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 573, § 1; Laws, 2002, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 5, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2003.

§ 15-1-37.
Limitations applicable to actions to recover property sold by order of chancery court or pursuant to decree of partition.

An action shall not be brought to recover any property (a) sold by order of a chancery court, where the sale is in good faith and the purchase money paid, or (b) partited in kind or sold for partition where the purchase money is paid, unless such action is brought within two years after possession is taken by the purchaser under the sale of the property or by the taker under the decree of partition.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 29; 1871, § 2173; 1880, § 2693; 1892, § 2760; 1906, § 3122; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2486; 1930, § 2315; 1942, § 745; Laws, 1954, ch. 218, § 1, eff 60 days after passage (approved April 20, 1954).

§ 15-1-39.
Limitations applicable to actions involving certain trusts.

Bills for relief, in case of the existence of a trust not cognizable by the courts of common law and in all other cases not herein provided for, shall be filed within ten years after the cause thereof shall accrue and not after, saving, however, to all persons under disability of infancy or unsoundness of mind, the like period of time after such disability shall be removed. However, the saving in favor of persons under disability of unsoundness of mind shall never extend longer than thirty-one years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 31; 1871, § 2175; 1880, § 2696; 1892, § 2763; 1906, § 3125; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2489; 1930, § 2316; 1942, § 746.

§ 15-1-41.
Limitations applicable to actions arising from deficiencies in constructions, or improvements to real property.

No action may be brought to recover damages for injury to property, real or personal, or for an injury to the person, arising out of any deficiency in the design, planning, supervision or observation of construction, or construction of an improvement to real property, and no action may be brought for contribution or indemnity for damages sustained on account of such injury except by prior written agreement providing for such contribution or indemnity, against any person, firm or corporation performing or furnishing the design, planning, supervision of construction or construction of such improvement to real property more than six (6) years after the written acceptance or actual occupancy or use, whichever occurs first, of such improvement by the owner thereof. This limitation shall apply to actions against persons, firms and corporations performing or furnishing the design, planning, supervision of construction or construction of such improvement to real property for the State of Mississippi or any agency, department, institution or political subdivision thereof as well as for any private or nongovernmental entity.

This limitation shall not apply to any person, firm or corporation in actual possession and control as owner, tenant or otherwise of the improvement at the time the defective and unsafe condition of such improvement causes injury.

This limitation shall not apply to actions for wrongful death.

The provisions of this section shall only apply to causes of action accruing from and after January 1, 1986; and any cause of action accruing prior to January 1, 1986, shall be governed by Chapter 350, Laws of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 720.5; Laws, 1966, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 350, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 332; Laws, 1985, ch. 505, § 5; Laws, 1994, ch. 626, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 15-1-43.
Limitations applicable to actions founded on domestic judgments or decrees; renewal of judgment or decree; notice of renewal.

All actions founded on any judgment or decree rendered by any court of record in this state, shall be brought within seven (7) years next after the rendition of such judgment or decree, or last renewal of judgment or decree, whichever is later.

A judgment or decree can be renewed only if, at the time of renewal, the existing judgment or decree has not expired. A judgment or decree may be renewed by the filing with the clerk of the court that rendered such judgment or decree a Notice of Renewal of Judgment or Decree substantially in the following form:

NOTICE OF RENEWAL OF JUDGMENT OR DECREE

Notice is given of renewal of judgment that was rendered and filed in this action as follows:

Date that judgment was filed;

Case number of such judgment;

Judgment was taken against;

Judgment was taken in favor of;

Current holder of such judgment;

Current amount owing of such judgment; and

Certification that at the time of the filing of the notice the judgment remains valid and has not been satisfied or barred.

If applicable, that a Notice of Renewal of Judgment or Decree has been previously filed with the clerk of the court that rendered such judgment on:

The renewal of such judgment is effective as of the date of the filing of the Notice of Renewal with the clerk of the court that rendered such judgment. The renewal of judgment shall be treated in the same manner as the previously rendered judgment. The circuit clerk shall enroll the Notice of Renewal showing the date of the filing of the Notice of Renewal, and the lien of the renewal of such judgment continues from the date of the enrollment of the existing judgment. The right to renew a judgment in any other manner allowed by law instead of using the above Notice of Renewal remains unimpaired.

At the time of the filing of the Notice of Renewal of Judgment, the judgment creditor or his attorney shall make and file with the clerk of the court that rendered the judgment an affidavit setting forth the name and last-known post office address of the judgment debtor and the judgment creditor. Promptly upon the filing of the Notice of Renewal of Judgment, the clerk shall mail notice of the filing of the Notice of Renewal of Judgment to the judgment debtor at the address given and shall make a note of the mailing in the docket. The notice shall include the name and post office address of the judgment creditor and the judgment creditor’s attorney, if any, in this state. In addition, the judgment creditor may mail a notice of the filing of the Notice of Renewal of Judgment to the judgment debtor and may file proof of mailing with the clerk. Lack of mailing notice of filing by the clerk shall not affect the validity of the renewal of judgment if proof of mailing by the judgment creditor has been filed.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 6 (13); 1857, ch. 57, art. 8; 1871, § 2153; 1880, § 2674; 1892, § 2743; 1906, § 3103; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2467; 1930, § 2303; 1942, § 733; Laws, 2010, ch. 352, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 539, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 15-1-45.
Limitations applicable to actions founded on foreign judgments or decrees.

All actions founded on any judgment or decree rendered by any court of record without this state shall be brought within seven years after the rendition of such judgment or decree, and not after. However, if the person against whom such judgment or decree was or shall be rendered, was, or shall be at the time of the institution of the action, a resident of this state, such action, founded on such judgment or decree, shall be commenced within three years next after the rendition thereof, and not after.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 6 (14); 1857, ch. 57, art. 9; 1871, § 2154; 1880, § 2675; 1892, § 2744; 1906, § 3104; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2468; 1930, § 2304; 1942, § 734.

§ 15-1-47.
Lien of judgments limited.

A judgment or decree rendered in any court held in this state shall not be a lien on the property of the defendant therein for a longer period than seven years from the rendition thereof, unless an action be brought thereon before the expiration of such time. However, the time during which the execution of a judgment or decree shall be stayed or enjoined by supersedeas, injunction or other process, shall not be computed as any part of the period of seven years.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 6 (13); 1857, ch. 57, art. 15; 1871, § 2159; 1880, § 2680; 1892, § 2750; 1906, § 3110; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2474; 1930, § 2305; 1942, § 735.

§ 15-1-49.
Limitations applicable to actions not otherwise specifically provided for.

All actions for which no other period of limitation is prescribed shall be commenced within three (3) years next after the cause of such action accrued, and not after.

In actions for which no other period of limitation is prescribed and which involve latent injury or disease, the cause of action does not accrue until the plaintiff has discovered, or by reasonable diligence should have discovered, the injury.

The provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall apply to all pending and subsequently filed actions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2669; 1892, § 2737; 1906, § 3097; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2461; 1930, § 2292; 1942, § 722; Laws, 1989, ch. 311, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 348, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 12, 1990).

§ 15-1-51.
Limitations of suits by and against the state, counties and municipal corporations.

Statutes of limitation in civil cases shall not run against the state, or any subdivision or municipal corporation thereof, except that any judgment or decree rendered in favor of the state, or any subdivision or municipal corporation thereof, shall not be a lien on the property of the defendant therein for a longer period than seven (7) years from the date of filing notice of the lien, unless an action is brought before the expiration of such time or unless the state or such subdivision or municipal corporation refiles notice of the lien. There shall be no limit upon the number of times that the state, or any subdivision or municipal corporation thereof, may refile such notices of lien.

The statutes of limitation shall run in favor of the state, the counties, and municipal corporations beginning at the time when the plaintiff first had the right to demand payment of the officer or board authorized to allow or disallow the claim sued upon. The provisions of this section shall apply to all pending and subsequently filed notices of liens.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 2736; 1906, § 3096; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2460; 1930, § 2291; 1942, § 721; Laws, 1991, ch. 503, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1991).

§ 15-1-53.
Effect of running of statute of limitations against executor, administrator, guardian, or other trustee, as against beneficiary.

When the legal title to property or a right in action is in an executor, administrator, guardian, or other trustee, the time during which any statute of limitations runs against such trustee shall be computed against the person beneficially interested in such property or right in action, although such person may be under disability and within the saving of any statute of limitations; and may be availed of in any suit or actions by such person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2694; 1892, § 2761; 1906, § 3123; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2487; 1930, § 2297; 1942, § 727.

§ 15-1-55.
Effect of death of party before bar is complete.

If a person entitled to bring any of the personal actions herein mentioned, or liable to any such action, shall die before the expiration of the time herein limited therefor, such action may be commenced by or against the executor or administrator of the deceased person, after the expiration of said time, and within one year after the death of such person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 18; 1871, § 2162; 1880, § 2683; 1892, § 2753; 1906, § 3113; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2477; 1930, § 2298; 1942, § 728.

§ 15-1-57.
Statute of limitations not to run when person prohibited to sue.

When any person shall be prohibited by law, or restrained or enjoined by the order, decree, or process of any court in this state from commencing or prosecuting any action or remedy, the time during which such person shall be so prohibited, enjoined or restrained, shall not be computed as any part of the period of time limited by this chapter for the commencement of such action.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 26; 1871, § 2170; 1880, § 2691; 1892, § 2758a; 1906, § 3120; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2484; 1930, § 2307; 1942, § 737.

§ 15-1-59.
Saving in favor of persons under disabilities.

If any person entitled to bring any of the personal actions mentioned shall, at the time at which the cause of action accrued, be under the disability of infancy or unsoundness of mind, he may bring the actions within the times in this chapter respectively limited, after his disability shall be removed as provided by law. However, the saving in favor of persons under disability of unsoundness of mind shall never extend longer than twenty-one (21) years.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 1 (7); 1857, ch. 57, art. 12; 1871, § 2156; 1880, § 2677; 1892, § 2746; 1906, § 3106; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2470; 1930, § 2308; 1942, § 738; Laws, 1983, ch. 482, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§ 15-1-61.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1975, ch. 402, eff from and after July 1, 1975.

[Codes, 1892, § 2747; 1906, § 3107; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2471; 1930, § 2309; 1942, § 739; Laws, 1888, p. 93.]

§ 15-1-63.
Effect of absence from the state.

If, after any cause of action has accrued in this state, the person against whom it has accrued be absent from and reside out of the state, the time of his absence shall not be taken as any part of the time limited for the commencement of the action, after he shall return.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 6 (11); 1857, ch. 57, art. 13; 1871, § 2157; 1880, § 2678; 1892, § 2748; 1906, § 3108; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2472; 1930, § 2310; 1942, § 740.

§ 15-1-65.
Action barred in another jurisdiction barred here.

When a cause of action has accrued outside of this state, and by the laws of the place outside this state where such cause of action accrued, an action thereon cannot be maintained by reason of lapse of time, then no action thereon shall be maintained in this state; provided, however, that where such a cause of action has accrued in favor of a resident of this state, this state’s law on the period of limitation shall apply.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2684; 1892, § 2754; 1906, § 3114; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2478; 1930, § 2311; 1942, § 741; Laws, 1989, ch. 311, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 15-1-67.
Effect of fraudulent concealment of cause of action.

If a person liable to any personal action shall fraudulently conceal the cause of action from the knowledge of the person entitled thereto, the cause of action shall be deemed to have first accrued at, and not before, the time at which such fraud shall be, or with reasonable diligence might have been, first known or discovered.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 14; 1871, § 2158; 1880, § 2679; 1892, § 2749; 1906, § 3109; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2473; 1930, § 2312; 1942, § 742.